Arkansas, session 2025, SB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-55-204 is amended to read as follows:
15-55-204. State Geologist.
(a)(1) The State Geologist shall be appointed by and serve at the
pleasure of the Governor.
(2) The State Geologist shall report to the Director of
Production and Conservation and the Secretary of the Department of Energy and
Environment.
(b) The State Geologist shall:
(1) Be be charged with the duty of administering the provisions
of this subchapter, the rules and orders established under this subchapter,
performing services requested by the director, and administering specified
provisions of Title 15, Chapter 71, and rules and orders established under
Title 15, Chapter 71; and
(2) Be custodian of all property held in the name of the Office
*CRH184*
02/24/2025 12:24:19 PM CRH184

SB280
of the State Geologist, and shall be, ex officio, in consultation with the
director and the secretary, the disbursing agent of all funds available for
its use.
(c) The State Geologist may delegate his or her functions, powers, and
duties as he or she may deem desirable and necessary for the effective and
efficient operation of the office Office of State Geologist.
(d) In addition to other duties and functions prescribed for the State
Geologist, he or she shall advise the director, the secretary, the Governor,
and the General Assembly, on all geological matters concerning the state.
(e) The director shall be the:
(1) Custodian of all property held in the name of the office;
and
(2) Disbursing agent, in consultation with the secretary, of all
funds available for the office's use.






















02/24/2025 12:24:19 PM CRH184